Washington statutes.
RCW 26.27.521

Recognition and enforcement.

A court of this state shall accord full faith and credit to an order issued by another state and consistent with this chapter that enforces a child custody determination by a court of another state unless the order has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under Article 2.

[ 2001 c 65 s 313.]